Maryland, session 2025, SB0813.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
16–410.
(a) The Board of Community College Trustees for Howard County consists of
[seven] NINE members appointed by the [Governor] HOWARD COUNTY SENATE
DELEGATION with the advice and consent of the Senate.
(b) (1) Of the members, at least [six] EIGHT:
– 1 –

Ch. 585 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) (I) Shall be residents of Howard County at the time of appointment;
and
(2) (II) Shall maintain residency in Howard County throughout the term
of appointment.
(2) THE FOLLOWING, WHICHEVER IS GREATER, SHALL CONSTITUTE A
QUORUM:
(I) FOUR MEMBERS; OR
(II) A MAJORITY OF MEMBERS ACTIVELY SERVING.
(C) EACH MEETING OF THE BOARD SHALL INCLUDE AN OPPORTUNITY FOR
PUBLIC COMMENT.
(D) (1) THE BOARD SHALL MAKE A VIDEO OR AUDIO RECORDING OF EACH
MEETING OF THE BOARD.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL MAKE A RECORDING REQUIRED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC ON THE BOARD’S
WEBSITE WITHOUT CHARGE AND, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, WITHIN 12 HOURS
2 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE RECORDING IS MADE.
(E) (1) EVERY AS PART OF ONGOING TRAINING FOR BOARD MEMBERS
AND AT LEAST EVERY 2 YEARS, THE BOARD MEMBERS SHALL UNDERGO TRAINING
ON THE PURPOSE OF A BOARD OF TRUSTEES SPECIFIC TO BOARD GOVERNANCE,
STRUCTURE, RESPONSIBILITIES, AND ROLES.
(2) THE TRAINING REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED BY AN INDEPENDENT NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION.
(F) (1) EACH YEAR, THE BOARD SHALL SELECT AN INDEPENDENT,
NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED SURVEY INSTRUMENT TO CARRY OUT AN ANONYMOUS
SURVEY ON EMPLOYEE SATISFACTION AT HOWARD COMMUNITY COLLEGE, AND
SUBMIT AN UNEDITED REPORT ON ITS SURVEY FINDINGS DIRECTLY TO THE BOARD.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL REDACT ANY HUMAN RESOURCES OR
PERSONNEL–RELATED FEEDBACK BEFORE ANY PUBLIC RELEASE OF SURVEY
RESULTS.
16–410.1.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 585
(A) BEFORE THE BOARD OF COMMUNITY COLLEGE TRUSTEES FOR
HOWARD COUNTY RENEWS THE CONTRACT OF THE CURRENT HOWARD COMMUNITY
COLLEGE PRESIDENT, THE BOARD SHALL:
(1) OPERATE IN AN OPEN AND TRANSPARENT MANNER REGARDING
THE POTENTIAL CONTRACT RENEWAL;
(2) PROVIDE OPPORTUNITY FOR PUBLIC COMMENT; AND
(3) SOLICIT PUBLIC FEEDBACK.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING THE TERMS OF THE CONTRACT, FOR EACH
CONTRACT FOR THE POSITION OF HOWARD COMMUNITY COLLEGE PRESIDENT
EXECUTED ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2025, THE COMPENSATION FOLLOWING
TERMINATION OF THE CONTRACT SHALL BE:
(1) IF 1 YEAR OR LESS REMAINS ON THE CONTRACT, EQUAL TO THE
COMPENSATION SET FOR THAT REMAINING TIME PERIOD; OR
(2) IF GREATER THAN 1 YEAR REMAINS ON THE CONTRACT, EQUAL TO
1 YEAR’S COMPENSATION PLUS 1 MONTH’S COMPENSATION FOR EACH ADDITIONAL
FULL YEAR REMAINING ON THE CONTRACT.
(C) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, AND EACH 6 MONTHS THEREAFTER
UNTIL JULY 1, 2028 A FACULTY UNION CONTRACT IS FINALIZED, THE BOARD OF
COMMUNITY COLLEGE TRUSTEES FOR HOWARD COUNTY SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT
TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE STATUS OF THE FACULTY UNION CONTRACT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the initial terms of the two
additional appointed members of the Board of Community College Trustees for Howard
County, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, shall expire as follows:
(1) one member in 2032; and
(2) one member in 2033.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –